Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-2011
Rules and regulations.

The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Community College Gap Assistance Program Act.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 37.